Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2,148
Effect of entity conversion.

(MBCA 9.55) (a) When
a conversion under sections 21-2,143 to 21-2,149 becomes effective:

(1) The title to all
real and personal property, both tangible and intangible, of the converting
entity remains in the surviving entity without reversion or impairment;

(2) The liabilities of
the converting entity remain the liabilities of the surviving entity;

(3) An action or proceeding
pending against the converting entity continues against the surviving entity
as if the conversion had not occurred;

(4) In the case of a surviving entity that is a filing
entity, its articles of incorporation or public organic document and its private
organic document become effective;

(5) In the case of a surviving entity that is a nonfiling
entity, its private organic document becomes effective;

(6) The shares or interests
of the converting entity are reclassified into shares, interests, other securities,
obligations, rights to acquire shares, interests, or other securities, or
into cash or other property in accordance with the plan of conversion, and
the shareholders or interest holders of the converting entity are entitled
only to the rights provided to them under the terms of the conversion and
to any appraisal rights they may have under the organic law of the converting
entity; and

(7)
The surviving entity is deemed to:

(i) Be incorporated or organized under and subject
to the organic law of the converting entity for all purposes;

(ii) Be the same corporation
or unincorporated entity without interruption as the converting entity; and

(iii) Have been incorporated
or otherwise organized on the date that the converting entity was originally
incorporated or organized.

(b) When a conversion of a domestic business corporation
to a foreign other entity becomes effective, the surviving entity is deemed
to agree that it will promptly pay the amount, if any, to which such shareholders
are entitled under sections 21-2,171 to 21-2,183.

(c) A shareholder who becomes subject
to owner liability for some or all of the debts, obligations, or liabilities
of the surviving entity shall be personally liable only for those debts, obligations,
or liabilities of the surviving entity that arise after the effective time
of the articles of entity conversion.

(d) The owner liability of an interest holder in an
unincorporated entity that converts to a domestic business corporation shall
be as follows:

(1)
The conversion does not discharge any owner liability under the organic law
of the unincorporated entity to the extent any such owner liability arose
before the effective time of the articles of entity conversion;

(2) The interest holder
shall not have owner liability under the organic law of the unincorporated
entity for any debt, obligation, or liability of the corporation that arises
after the effective time of the articles of entity conversion;

(3) The provisions of
the organic law of the unincorporated entity shall continue to apply to the
collection or discharge of any owner liability preserved by subdivision (1)
of this subsection as if the conversion had not occurred; and

(4) The interest holder
shall have whatever rights of contribution from other interest holders that
are provided by the organic law of the unincorporated entity with respect
to any owner liability preserved by subdivision (1) of this subsection as
if the conversion had not occurred.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 148.